Hawaii statutes.
§651-8 Amount levied on. The police
officer shall attach a sufficient amount of the property of the defendant if
sufficient not exempt from execution can be found, giving that to which the
defendant has an unquestionable title a preference over that to which the
defendant's title is doubtful. The police officer shall, as nearly as the
circumstances of the case will permit, levy upon property twenty per cent
greater in value than the amount which the plaintiff in the plaintiff's
affidavit claims to be due. When property is seized on attachment, the court
may allow to the officer having charge thereof such compensation for the
officer's trouble and expenses in keeping the same as is reasonable and just.
[L 1905, c 84, §8; RL 1925, §2812; RL 1935, §4197; RL 1945, §10148; RL 1955,
§233-8; HRS §651-8; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 33 H. 364, 366 (1935).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next